Hawaii statutes.
§454M-10 Penalty. Any person
who violates any provision of this chapter may be subject to an administrative
fine of not more than $7,000 for each violation; provided that if the aggregate
fine amount exceeds $7,000, $1,000 of the aggregate fine amount shall be
deposited into the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution special fund
established pursuant to section 667-86. [L 2009, c 106, pt of §1; am L 2011, c
48, §11; am L 2012, c 182, §5; am L 2016, c 122, §26]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next